Hawaii statutes.
§264-63 Acquisition of property.
For the purposes of this part, the director of transportation may acquire for
controlled-access facilities and service roads:

(1) Property, as defined in chapter 101, by gift,
devise, or purchase; or

(2) Property by eminent domain under chapter 101. [L
1960, c 3, pt of §2; Supp, §111-46; HRS §264-63]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next